California statutes. Financial Code
(b) A lease made for commercial, corporate, business, or agricultural purposes pursuant to this section shall be subject to all limitations applicable to the amount of an association’s investment in commercial loans.

(c) A lease of
 residential or nonresidential real property made pursuant to this section shall be subject to all limitations applicable to the amount of an association’s investment in real estate loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 8.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7703.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) A “net lease” is a lease under which the association will not, directly or indirectly, provide or be obligated to provide for:

(1) The servicing, repair, or maintenance of the leased property during the lease term.

(2) The purchasing of parts and accessories for the leased property; provided that improvements and additions to the leased property may be leased to the lessee upon its request in
 accordance with the full pay-out requirement of this section.

(3) The loan of replacement or substitute property while the leased property is being serviced.

(4) The purchasing of insurance for a lessee, except where the lessee has failed to discharge a contractual obligation to purchase or maintain insurance.

(5) The renewal of any license, registration, or filing for the property unless such action by the association is necessary to protect its interest as an owner or financer of the property.

(b) A “full-payout” lease is one from which the lessor can reasonably expect to realize a return of its full investment in the leased property, plus the estimated cost of financing the property over the term of the lease, from rentals, estimated tax benefits,
 and the estimated residual value of the property at the expiration of the initial term of the lease; provided that no more than 20 percent of the return may be realized from the residual value of the property at the expiration of the initial term of the lease. Both the estimated residual value of the property and that portion of the estimated residual value relied upon by the lessor to satisfy the requirements of a full-payout lease must be reasonable in light of the nature of the leased property and all relevant circumstances so that realization of the lessor’s full investment plus the cost of financing the property depends primarily on the creditworthiness of the lessee, and not on the residual market value of the leased property. The maximum term of a full-payout lease shall be 40 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 8.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7704.

If, in good faith, an association believes that there has been an unanticipated change in conditions that threatens its financial position by significantly increasing its exposure to loss, the provisions of Sections 7702 and 7703 of this article shall not prevent the association:

(a) As the owner and lessor under a net, full pay-out lease, from taking reasonable and appropriate action to salvage or protect the value of the property or its interest arising under the lease.

(b) As the assignee of a
 lessor’s interest in a lease, from becoming the owner and lessor of the leased property pursuant to its contractual right, or from taking any reasonable and appropriate action to salvage or protect the value of the property or its interest arising under the lease.

(c) From including any provisions in a lease, or from making any additional agreements, to protect its financial position or investment in the circumstances set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 225, Sec. 8.   Effective June 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Leasing [7720. - 7720.]

7720.

(a) An association may invest in tangible personal property, including without limitation, vehicles, mobilehomes, machinery, equipment, or furniture, and may hold the property for rental or sale.

(b) Investment under this section is limited to not in excess of 10 percent of the total assets of the association.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7700 by Stats. 1990, Ch. 216, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Hazard Insurance [7800. - 7800.]

7800.

Subject to the provisions of Section 2955.5 of the Civil Code, the board of directors of every association and affiliate or service corporation of an association shall establish standards for the maintenance of hazard insurance which are considered necessary to protect the institution’s interest in real estate security for its loans. The standards may include establishment of criteria based on such factors as recognized financial ratings of insurers and coverage forms, but those standards may not be based on the insurer’s corporate structure. Subject to compliance with these standards, an association, an affiliate or service corporation of an association
 shall permit a borrower to have reasonable freedom of choice in selecting the insurer to provide hazard insurance coverage on the real estate security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Supervision [8009. - 8254.]



  ARTICLE 1. Department of Savings and Loan [8009. - 8010.]

8009.

(a) Except where required by law, regulation, or court order, or permitted under subdivision (b), the commissioner, and all employees of the department, shall not disclose any information acquired by them in the discharge of their duties as prescribed by this division.

(b) The commissioner may furnish information relating to the condition or operation of any association or other person to state and federal authorities that supervise financial institutions, to state, local and federal law enforcement agencies, and state agencies that are
 engaged in any investigation of an unsafe or unsound business practice.

(c) No record or document in the possession or custody of the department which contains information specified in subdivision (a) shall be produced pursuant to a subpoena duces tecum addressed to the commissioner or any employee of the department except upon a determination of a court of competent jurisdiction that disclosure of the information in the record or document would serve the public interest and assist the department in conducting the duties prescribed by this subdivision. With respect to each item subject to the subpoena duces tecum, the court shall either make this determination or shall determine that the item is not subject to disclosure. The court’s determination shall be made upon hearing on a motion by the subpoenaing party under this subdivision to compel production of the document or record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 868, Sec. 9.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

8010.

The commissioner, after a determination of value made in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 8150) of Chapter 7, may order that assets, individually or in the aggregate, to the extent that the assets are overvalued on an association’s books, be charged off against current operations, or that a special reserve or reserves equal to the overvaluation be set up by transfers from retained earnings or reserves.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 868, Sec. 10.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Savings and Loan Account [8030. - 8037.]

8030.

(a) To meet the operating costs and expenses of the department in administering this division and other laws relating to savings associations or the savings association business, for the payment of which no provision is otherwise made, the commissioner shall require each association doing business in this state to pay in advance an annual assessment for its pro rata share of all operating costs and expenses as estimated by the commissioner for the ensuing year.

(b) As used
 in this article, “association” includes a foreign savings association doing business in this state under an approval issued by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 562.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8031.

The proportion of operating costs and expenses to be assessed against each association shall be determined and prescribed by the commissioner by regulation. The total amount assessed for all associations, together with any existing surplus, shall not exceed the amount of the budget for the ensuing fiscal year plus a reasonable reserve for contingencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 35.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

8032.

(a) On or before the 20th day of June of each year the commissioner shall notify each association by mail of the amount assessed and levied against it. 

(b) Except as provided in this article, an association shall pay one-half or more of the amount assessed so as to be received by the commissioner not later than the 10th day of July and shall pay the remainder so as to be received by the commissioner not later than the following 10th day of January.

(c) If payment is not received by the commissioner on
 time, the commissioner shall assess and collect in addition to the annual assessment, a penalty of 5 percent of the unpaid assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8033.

If an association ceases to be an association by reason of merger, consolidation, conversion, acquisition of assets, or a similar type of transaction, any unpaid assessment for the fiscal year ended June 30 in which the conversion, merger, or acquisition occurs shall be due and payable on or before the day preceding the date of the conversion, merger, or acquisition. Payment of the unpaid assessment under this section shall be a condition of approval of any transaction requiring the commissioner’s approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8034.

(a) If a new domestic association is formed during a fiscal year, the initial assessment provided for by this article shall be computed on the same basis as if such new association had been an association and assessed on or before the 20th day of June in the fiscal year preceding the initial assessment except that the initial assessment shall be based on the assets of the new association at the time of issuance of its certificate of authority and, except as provided in subdivision (b), the assessment shall be reduced, if the certificate of authority is not issued in July, by one-twelfth for each full month of the fiscal year
 which has expired at the time of issuance of the certificate of authority and shall be payable in full on the date of issuance.

(b) In the levy and collection of an assessment under this article, no association shall be assessed for, or be permitted to pay less than five hundred dollars ($500) for the unexpired portion of the fiscal year in which the domestic association is formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 15.5.)
-------------------------------------------

8035.

If any domestic association proposes to acquire the assets of any federal association or any state or national bank by transfer, conversion, or otherwise, the initial assessment provided for by this article shall be computed on the same basis as if the federal association or state or national bank had been an association and assessed on or before the 20th day of June in the fiscal year preceding the initial assessment, except that the initial assessment shall be based on the assets of the federal association or of the state or national bank, as shown by the
 institution’s report to the Office of Thrift Supervision, the commissioner, or the Comptroller of the Currency, respectively, next preceding the 20th day of June in the fiscal year preceding the initial assessment and the assessment shall be reduced, if the certificate of authority is not issued in July, by one-twelfth for each full month of the fiscal year which has expired at the time of the issuance of the certificate of authority and shall be payable in full on the date of issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 563.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8035.5.

As of the operative date of this section:

(a) The Savings Association Special Regulatory Fund is converted into a separate account in the Financial Institutions Fund and designated as the Savings and Loan Account.

(b) All moneys and other assets and all liabilities of the Savings Association Special Regulatory Fund shall be transferred to the Savings and Loan Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 563.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8036.

All money collected or received by the commissioner under this division or any other law relating to savings associations or the savings association business, except money belonging to associations whose business property and assets are in the possession of the commissioner, shall be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the Savings and Loan Account in the Financial Institutions Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 564.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8037.

All expenses of the department in administering the division and other laws relating to savings associations or to the savings association business shall be paid by the Savings and Loan Account; and, except as otherwise provided in Section 276 or 277, and the Savings and Loan Account shall be used only for such purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 565.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Supervisory Powers and Duties of Commissioner [8050. - 8055.]

8050.

(a) The commissioner shall have general supervision over all (1) associations, (2) savings and loan holding companies, (3) service corporations, (4) finance subsidiaries, and (5) other persons that are subject to the provisions of this division.

(b) The commissioner shall enforce the purposes of this division by use of the powers conferred by it and by an action in any court of competent jurisdiction if required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 46.7.)
-------------------------------------------

8051.

Each decision, order, or instruction shall be in writing signed by the commissioner or a deputy commissioner and shall be sent by registered or first-class mail, addressed to the home office of the appropriate association or person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 361, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

8053.

The commissioner may from time to time issue, amend and rescind any rules, regulations, forms, and orders that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this division, including rules and regulations governing the administration of any association, savings and loan holding company and their subsidiaries, and defining any terms whether or not used in the law insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this division. The commissioner may waive any requirement of any rule or regulation in situations where, in the commissioner’s opinion, the requirement is not necessary in the public interest or for the protection of the
 public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8054.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever by statute or regulation there is extended to federal associations doing business in this state any right, power, privilege, or duty not authorized for state associations, the commissioner may by regulation extend to state associations that right, power, privilege, or duty.

(b) Any regulation adopted under this section shall expire at 12 p.m. on December 31 of the year following the calendar year in which it is
 promulgated.

(c) For the purposes of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code regulations adopted under this section are subject only to the provisions of Sections 11343.4, 11346.1, and 11349.6 of the Government Code.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any federal statute or regulation promulgated prior to January 1, 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 9.2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8055.

Every final decision of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in accordance with law. An action or proceeding for judicial review pursuant to this section shall be commenced within 60 days after issuance of the final decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 361, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Reports and Examinations [8150. - 8160.]

8150.

(a) On or before the last day of January in each year, or within 30 days following the end of the fiscal year, each association, savings and loan holding company, and those subsidiaries of an association or savings and loan holding company that the commissioner may require, shall make an annual written report to the commissioner, in a format to be prescribed by the commissioner.

(b) Each report shall be verified by an authorized officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

8151.

Each association, savings and loan holding company and subsidiary of any association or savings and loan holding company that is required to file an annual report under Section 8150 also shall make any other reports that the commissioner may from time to time require, which shall be in a format and filed on a date that the commissioner may prescribe and shall, if required by the commissioner, be verified in the same manner as the annual report.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8152.

From time to time the commissioner may, without previous notice, examine or cause an examination to be made into the affairs of each association, and any office of the association within or outside this state, savings and loan holding company and subsidiary of any association or savings and loan holding company subject to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 404, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8153.

(a) In lieu of a report or an examination under Section 8150 or 8152, the commissioner may accept any report made to, or examination made by, a federal or state authority that supervises financial institutions, or by a certified or other public accountant or firm of certified or other public accountants selected by the association and approved by the commissioner.

(b) An examination under Section 8152 may be conducted in conjunction with an examination by a federal authority that supervises financial institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8154.

(a) Whenever, in the judgment of the commissioner, the condition of any association, savings and loan holding company, or any of their subsidiaries renders it necessary or expedient to make an extra examination or audit or to devote any extraordinary attention to its affairs, the commissioner shall do so or may appoint a certified public accountant or any expert to do so.

(b) The association, savings and loan holding company, or subsidiary specially examined under this section may be required to pay the actual expenses incurred by the commissioner for all extra
 services rendered by the commissioner, by the appointed accountant, or any expert.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

8155.

(a) The commissioner is authorized in connection with any examination or audit of any association or any subsidiary to cause to be made appraisals of real estate or other property held by it or securing its assets.

(b) Unless otherwise ordered by the commissioner, appraisal of real estate or other property in connection with any examination or audit pursuant to this article shall be made by a department appraiser or by an independent professional appraiser employed or selected by the commissioner, and the cost of the appraisal promptly shall be paid by the association or
 subsidiary to the commissioner or directly to the appraiser upon receipt by it of a statement of cost bearing the written approval of the commissioner.

(c) A copy of the report of each appraisal caused to be made by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be furnished to the association or subsidiary within a reasonable time, not to exceed 60 days, following the completion of the appraisals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8156.

(a) Each association shall at least annually cause its books and accounts to be audited at its own expense by a certified public accountant or firm of certified public accountants selected by the association and approved by the commissioner.

(b) The annual audit date and audit period shall be approved in writing by the commissioner prior to commencement of the audit.

(c) Each savings association which engages certified public accountant services for any audit shall transmit to the accountant or
 accountants copies of the most recent report of condition made by the association pursuant to state or federal law and a copy of the most recent report of examination received by the savings association.

(d) In addition to the copies of the reports required to be provided pursuant to subdivision (c), each savings association shall provide the auditing accountant or accountants with all of the following:

(1) A copy of any supervisory memorandum of understanding with the association and any written agreement between the association and any federal financial regulatory agency or the commissioner which is in effect during the period covered by the audit.

(2) A report of any action initiated or taken pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (e), (g), (i), or (s) of Section 8 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C.
 1818), and a report of any action taken by the commissioner pursuant to Section 8200 or 8201, or any other civil monetary penalty assessed under any provision of law with respect to the savings association or any institution-affiliated party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

8157.

(a) The commissioner may prescribe the scope of the annual audit and may require the auditor to furnish information in addition to that contained in the audit report.

(b) Each association shall furnish the commissioner annually, within 90 days after the end of the period covered by the audit, five copies of the financial statements, which shall be accompanied by a report signed by the auditor, prepared and containing the information prescribed in regulations of the commissioner. The financial statements shall be certified by the auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 361, Sec. 13.5.)
-------------------------------------------

8158.

(a) The commissioner, or any department employee authorized by the commissioner, shall have free access to all books and records of an association, savings and loan holding company, and any of their subsidiaries that relate to the business of the association, holding company, or subsidiary, and to the books and records kept by any officer, agent, or employee that relate to the business of the association, holding company, or subsidiary.

(b) The commissioner, or any department employee authorized by the commissioner, may summon witnesses and administer oaths or
 affirmations in the examination of the directors, officers, agents, or employees of any association, savings and loan holding company, any of their subsidiaries, or any other person, in relation to their affairs, transactions, and conditions, and may require and compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts, or other documents by court order, if not voluntarily produced.

(c) This section applies to all parties designated in subdivisions (a) and (b) when an association is placed in conservatorship or receivership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 730, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

8159.

For each department examination or appraisal made outside this state, a reasonable fee and the actual traveling expenses incurred shall be paid to the department by the association, savings and loan holding company, or subsidiary so examined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

8160.

If an association, savings and loan holding company, or any subsidiary of an association or savings and loan holding company fails to report to the commissioner as required by this article, the commissioner may impose penalties in accordance with the following:

(a) Any association, savings and loan holding company, or any subsidiary of an association or savings and loan holding company which (1) maintains procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any inadvertent error and, unintentionally and as a result of such an error (A) fails to make, obtain, transmit, or publish any report or information
 required by the commissioner by the due date set forth in this article or, if no due date is set forth in this article, the date specified by the commissioner, or (B) submits or publishes any false or misleading report or information or (2) inadvertently transmits or publishes any report which is minimally late, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each day during which the failure continues or the false or misleading information is not corrected. The association, savings and loan holding company, or subsidiary of an association or savings and loan holding company shall have the burden of proving that an error was inadvertent and that a report was inadvertently transmitted or published late.

(b) Any association, savings and loan holding company, or any subsidiary of an association or savings and loan holding company which (1) fails to make, obtain, transmit, or publish any report or information
 required by the commissioner by the due date set forth in this article or, if no due date is set forth in this article, the date specified by the commissioner or (2) submits or publishes any false or misleading report or information, in a manner not described in subdivision (a) shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each day during which the failure continues or the false and misleading information is not corrected.

(c) Any association, savings and loan holding company, or any subsidiary of an association or savings and loan holding company which knowingly or with reckless disregard for the accuracy of any information or report subject to this section submits or publishes any false or misleading report or information, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) or 1 percent of total assets of the savings institution, whichever is less, per day for each
 day during which the false or misleading information is not corrected. 

(d) Any penalty imposed under subdivisions (a), (b), or (c) shall be assessed and collected by the commissioner in the same manner as provided in Section 5330.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Enforcement [8200. - 8202.]

8200.

The commissioner may issue cease and desist orders which may order affirmative action in accordance with the following:

(a) If the commissioner, as a result of any examination or from any report, finds or has reasonable cause to believe (1) that any savings association, savings and loan holding company or any of their subsidiaries, or an institution-affiliated party, (A) is violating or has violated any provision of this division or the laws of this state or of the United States or any order, regulation, or any condition imposed in writing by the commissioner in connection with the granting
 of any application of an association or any written agreement entered into with the commissioner or (B) is engaging or has engaged in an unsafe or unsound business practice, or (2) that an association, savings and loan holding company, or any of their subsidiaries are maintaining books and records that are so incomplete and inaccurate that the commissioner is unable, through the normal supervisory process, to determine their financial condition or the details or purpose of any transaction that may have a material effect on their financial condition, the commissioner may issue a formal written order to be served by delivery to the home office of the association or to the person named in the order. The order shall state the alleged violation or practice and state the facts in support of the allegation, and shall order discontinuance of the violation or practice and order conformance with all requirements of law. The commissioner may require the association or other named person to take affirmative action (A)
 to prevent the insolvency or dissipation of assets of the association, or (B) to restore the books and records to a complete and accurate state.

(b) The authority of the commissioner to issue orders to correct any conditions resulting from any violation or practice includes the authority to require the person named in the order to do any of the following:

(1) Make restitution or provide reimbursement, indemnification, or guarantee against loss if (A) the person named in the order was unjustly enriched in connection with the violation or practice or (B) the violation or practice involved a reckless disregard for any state or federal statute or applicable regulations or prior order of the commissioner.

(2) Restrict the growth of the association.

(3) Dispose of any loan or asset involved.

(4) Rescind agreements or contracts.

(5) Employ qualified officers or employees (who may be subject to prior approval of the commissioner at his or her direction).

(6) Take such other action as the commissioner determines to be appropriate. 

(c) The authority to issue orders includes the authority to place limitations on the activities or functions of the person named in the order.

(d) The order shall specify an effective date, which may be immediate or may be at a later date, and shall remain in effect until withdrawn by the commissioner or until terminated by a court order.

(e) Any association or person affected by an order of the commissioner may apply within 10 days after service of the order to a court having jurisdiction for an immediate hearing and may request a stay of the order until the hearing has been completed. The hearing shall be held as provided in a notice to the commissioner by the court.

(f) The commissioner may, on or after the effective date of the order, apply for enforcement of the order to the superior court in the county in which the home office of the association or the person is located. The order shall be enforced ex parte and without notice by the court. The proceedings shall be given precedence over other cases pending in court, and shall in every way be expedited. 

(g) Whether upon application by the commissioner or by the person named in the order, the court shall have jurisdiction, shall adjudicate the
 question, and shall enter and enforce the proper order or orders.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

8201.

(a) Whenever the commissioner determines that any institution-affiliated party or any director, officer, or employee of a savings and loan holding company or affiliate thereof has committed any of the following violations, engaged or participated in any of the following unsafe or unsound practices, or committed any of the following breaches of fiduciary duty that meet the additional criteria of subdivision (b), the commissioner may serve upon that person a written notice of the commissioner’s intent to order the removal of the person from his or her office or employment or to prohibit any further participation (in any manner) in the
 conduct of the affairs of any savings association, or both:

(1) Violation of any statute or regulation, any cease and desist order which has become final, any condition imposed in writing by the commissioner in connection with the grant of any application or other request by the savings association or any written agreement between the savings institution and the commissioner. 

(2) Engaging or participating in any unsafe or unsound practice in connection with any savings association.

(3) Committing or engaging in any act, omission, or practice which constitutes a breach of the person’s fiduciary duty.

(b) A violation, practice, or breach specified in subdivision (a) is subject to the commissioner’s authority under this section if the commissioner finds
 both of the following:

(1) By reason of the violation, practice, or breach (A) the savings association has suffered or will probably suffer financial loss or other damage (B) the interests of the savings association’s depositors have been or could be prejudiced, or (C) the institution-affiliated party or other person specified in subdivision (a) has received financial gain or other benefit by reason of the violation, practice, or breach.

(2) The violation, practice, or breach (A) involves personal dishonesty on the part of the institution-affiliated party or other person specified in subdivision (a) or (B) demonstrates willful or continuing disregard by the institution-affiliated party or other person for the safety or soundness of the savings institution.

(c) The written notice shall contain a full statement of the
 alleged violations, practices, or breaches of fiduciary duty, shall state the facts alleged in support of the violation, practice or breach, and shall state the commissioner’s intention to enter a removal or prohibition order, or both. The notice shall be delivered to the board of directors of the association, savings and loan holding company, or subsidiary, and to the institution-affiliated party or other director, officer, or employee concerned. If a hearing on the matter is requested within 10 days after service of the written notice, the commissioner shall hold a public hearing at which any pertinent evidence relating to the matters set forth in the written notice may be presented. After the hearing, the commissioner, on the basis of the evidence presented at the hearing, may proceed to enter (1) an order for the immediate removal of the institution-affiliated party or director, officer, or employee affected, (2) an order prohibiting further participation by the person, in any manner, in the conduct of
 the affairs of any savings association, (3) a reprimand of the individuals and entities or other persons concerned, or (4) a dismissal of the entire matter.

(d) If no hearing is requested within the time specified, the commissioner may proceed to issue orders of removal, prohibition, or both on the basis of the facts set forth in the written notice.

(e) No institution-affiliated party or director, officer, or employee who has been removed from his or her position pursuant to a removal order that has become final, shall thereafter participate in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the savings association from or with respect to which that director, officer, or employee was removed, or without prior written approval of the commissioner, serve as a director, officer, or employee of any other savings association. No institution-affiliated party, including an officer, director,
 or employee, who is subject to an order of prohibition which has become final shall thereafter participate, in any manner, in the conduct of the affairs of any savings association.

(f) In respect to any officer, director, or employee of a savings association, savings and loan holding company or subsidiary thereof who is the subject of a written notice served by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a), the commissioner may, if the commissioner deems it necessary for the protection of the savings association or the interests of the association’s depositors, by written notice to that effect served upon the officer, director, employee, suspend him or her from office or prohibit him or her from further participation in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the savings association or related entity, or take both these actions. The suspension or prohibition shall become effective upon service of the notice and, unless stayed by the court in
 proceedings authorized by subdivision (g), shall remain in effect pending completion of the proceedings pursuant to the written notice served under subdivision (a) and until the effective date of an order entered by the commissioner under subdivision (c) or (d). Copies of the notice shall also be served upon the savings association, savings and loan holding company, or subsidiary of which the person is a director, officer, or employee.

(g) Within 10 days after any director, officer, or employee has been suspended from office or prohibited from participation in the conduct of the affairs of a savings association, savings and loan holding company, or subsidiary thereof under subdivision (f), the director, officer, or employee may apply to a court having jurisdiction for a stay of the suspension or prohibition pending completion of the proceedings pursuant to subdivision (c), and the court shall have power to stay the suspension or
 prohibition.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

8202.

(a) The commissioner shall publish and make the following available to the public:

(1) Any final order issued with respect to any administrative enforcement proceeding initiated by the commissioner pursuant to this division or any other provision of law.

(2) Any modification to, or termination of, any final order specified in paragraph (1).

(b) If the commissioner makes a determination in writing that the publication of any final order
 pursuant to subdivision (a) would seriously threaten the safety or soundness of a savings association, the commissioner may delay the publication of the order for a reasonable time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Conservatorship [8225. - 8230.]

8225.

(a) Whenever the commissioner deems it necessary in order to conserve the assets of any association for the benefit of the depositors and other creditors, or if the commissioner finds any of the following with respect to any association: (1) the association is in an impaired condition; (2) the association is engaging in practices that threaten to result in an impaired condition; (3) the association has substantially dissipated its assets due to violation of law or regulation or to unsafe or unsound practice; (4) the association is in an unsafe or unsound condition to transact business; (5) the association